Illinois, session 104th, SB2161.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Central Management Services 5Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by 6adding Section 405-550 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 405/405-550 new)8    Sec. 405-550. Fire engine bid specification. The 9Department shall develop a fire engine bid specification, in 10consultation with the Office of the Illinois State Fire 11Marshal and the Fire Advisory Commission, to provide necessary 12bidding information. 13    Section 10. The Illinois Finance Authority Act is amended 14by changing Section 825-80 as follows: 15    (20 ILCS 3501/825-80)16    Sec. 825-80. Fire truck revolving loan program.17    (a) This Section is a continuation and re-enactment of the 18fire truck revolving loan program enacted as Section 3-27 of 19the Rural Bond Bank Act by Public Act 93-35, effective June 24, 202003, and repealed by Public Act 93-205, effective January 1, 212004. Under the Rural Bond Bank Act, the program was   SB2161- 2 -LRB104 08942 HLH 18997 b1administered by the Rural Bond Bank and the State Fire 2Marshal.3    (a-5) For purposes of this Section, "brush truck" means a 4pickup chassis with or equipped with a flatbed or a pickup box. 5The truck must be rated by the manufacturer as between 6three-fourths of a ton and one ton and outfitted with a fire or 7rescue apparatus. 8    (b) The Authority and the State Fire Marshal may jointly 9administer a fire truck revolving loan program. The program 10shall, in instances where sufficient loan funds exist to 11permit applications to be accepted, provide zero-interest and 12low-interest loans for the purchase of fire trucks by a fire 13department, a fire protection district, or a township fire 14department. For the purchase of brush trucks by a fire 15department, a fire protection district, or a township fire 16department, the program shall provide loans at a 2% rate of 17simple interest per year for a brush truck if both the chassis 18and the apparatus are built outside of Illinois, a 1% rate of 19simple interest per year for a brush truck if either the 20chassis or the apparatus is built in Illinois, or a 0% rate of 21interest for a brush truck if both the chassis and the 22apparatus are built in Illinois. The Authority shall make 23loans based on need, as determined by the State Fire Marshal.24    (c) The loan funds, subject to appropriation, shall be 25paid out of the Fire Truck Revolving Loan Fund, a special fund 26in the State Treasury. The Fund shall consist of any moneys   SB2161- 3 -LRB104 08942 HLH 18997 b1transferred or appropriated into the Fund, as well as all 2repayments of loans made under the program and any balance 3existing in the Fund on the effective date of this Section. The 4Fund shall be used for loans to fire departments and fire 5protection districts to purchase fire trucks and brush trucks 6and for no other purpose. All interest earned on moneys in the 7Fund shall be deposited into the Fund. As soon as practical 8after January 1, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 997-901), all moneys in the Fire Truck Revolving Loan Fund 10shall be paid by the State Fire Marshal to the Authority, and, 11on and after that date, all future moneys deposited into the 12Fire Truck Revolving Loan Fund under this Section shall be 13paid by the State Fire Marshal to the Authority under the 14continuing appropriation provision of subsection (c-1) of this 15Section; provided that the Authority and the State Fire 16Marshal enter into an intergovernmental agreement to use the 17moneys transferred to the Authority from the Fund solely for 18the purposes for which the moneys would otherwise be used 19under this Section and to set forth procedures to otherwise 20administer the use of the moneys. 21    (c-1) There is hereby appropriated, on a continuing annual 22basis in each fiscal year, from the Fire Truck Revolving Loan 23Fund, the amount, if any, of funds received into the Fire Truck 24Revolving Loan Fund to the State Fire Marshal for payment to 25the Authority for the purposes for which the moneys would 26otherwise be used under this Section.   SB2161- 4 -LRB104 08942 HLH 18997 b1    (d) A loan for the purchase of fire trucks or brush trucks 2may not exceed $500,000 $350,000 to any fire department or 3fire protection district. A loan for the purchase of brush 4trucks may not exceed $100,000 per truck. The repayment period 5for the loan may not exceed 20 years. The fire department or 6fire protection district shall repay each year at least 5% of 7the principal amount borrowed or the remaining balance of the 8loan, whichever is less. All repayments of loans shall be 9deposited into the Fire Truck Revolving Loan Fund.10    (e) The Authority and the State Fire Marshal may adopt 11rules in accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure 12Act to administer the program. 13    (f) Notwithstanding the repeal of Section 3-27 of the 14Rural Bond Bank Act, all otherwise lawful actions taken on or 15after January 1, 2004 and before the effective date of this 16Section by any person under the authority originally granted 17by that Section 3-27, including without limitation the 18granting, acceptance, and repayment of loans for the purchase 19of fire trucks, are hereby validated, and the rights and 20obligations of all parties to any such loan are hereby 21acknowledged and confirmed. 22(Source: P.A. 97-900, eff. 8-6-12; 97-901, eff. 1-1-13; 2398-463, eff. 8-16-13; 98-662, eff. 6-23-14.)